North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54. Cooperative Organizations.
Article 17. Stockholders and Officers.

§ 54-119.
Certificate for stock fully paid.

Certificates of stock shall not be issued to any subscriber until fully paid, but the bylaws of the association may allow subscribers to vote as shareholders: Provided, part of the stock subscribed for has been paid in cash.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 11; C.S., s. 5250.

§ 54-120.
Ownership of shares limited.

No shareholder in any such association shall own shares of a greater aggregate par value than twenty percent (20%) of the paid-in capital stock, except as hereinafter provided, or be entitled to more than one vote. A mutual association shall reserve the right of purchasing the stock of any member whose stock is for sale, and may restrict the transfer of stock to such persons as are made eligible to membership in the bylaws.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 9; C.S., s. 5251; 1925, c. 179, s. 1.

§ 54-121.
Shares issued on purchase of business.

Whenever an association, created under this Subchapter, shall purchase the business of another association or person, it may pay for the same in whole or in part by issuing to the selling association or persons shares of its capital stock to an amount which at par value would equal the fair market value of the business so purchased, and in such case the transfer to the association of such business at such valuation shall be equivalent to payment in cash for the shares of stock so issued.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 10; C.S., s. 5252.

§ 54-122.
Absent members voting.

At any regularly called general or special meeting of the shareholders a written vote received by mail from any absent shareholder, and signed by him, may be read in such meeting, and shall be equivalent to a vote of such of the shareholders so signing: Provided, he has been previously notified in writing of the exact motion or resolution upon which such vote is taken, and a copy of same is forwarded with and attached to the vote so mailed by him. In case of sickness or other unavoidable absence of a member, he shall be allowed to vote by proxy in writing; but no member shall vote more than one such proxy.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 12; C.S., s. 5253.

§ 54-123.
Directors and other officers.

Every such association shall be managed by a board of not less than five directors. The directors shall be elected by and from the stockholders of the association at such time and for such term of office as the bylaws may prescribe, and shall hold office for the time for which elected and until their successors are elected and shall enter upon the discharge of such duties as are prescribed in the bylaws; but a majority of the stockholders shall have the power at any regular or special stockholders’ meeting, legally called, to remove any director or officer for cause, and fill the vacancy, and thereupon the director or officer so removed shall cease to be a director or officer of the association. The officers of every such association shall be a president, one or more vice-presidents, a secretary and treasurer, who shall be elected annually by the directors, and each of the officers must be a director of the association. The office of secretary and treasurer may be combined, and when so combined the person filling the office shall be secretary-treasurer.

History.

1915, c. 144, s. 6; C.S., s. 5254.